Louisiana, session 2026, HB431.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:1420.31 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1420.31. Local government officials; training; certain municipalities
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all mayors
shall, and members of the governing authorities of municipalities with a population
of fifteen thousand persons or less according the latest federal decennial census may,
participate in workshops and other training courses offered by state agencies,
associations, or groups that provide training to local government officials, which are
intended to assist such officials in carrying out their duties by enhancing their
knowledge of laws regulating their respective municipalities. Any such elected
official may use any local government resource provided by such agencies,
associations, or groups to the officials and their respective municipalities and make
such resources available to administrative staff members.
B. Any state agency, association, or group provided for in Subsection A of
this Section may shall work jointly with the Louisiana Municipal Association to
provide workshops, training courses, and other resources to the elected officials and
may offer incentives to the officials, such as continuing education credits or
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 431 ENROLLED
certificates for specialization in certain subject matters, to encourage their use of
resources and attendance at workshops and training courses.
C. All mayors shall earn not less than sixteen hours of credit annually
through the attendance at workshops, national conferences, and other training
courses, including continuing legal education, that are offered by state agencies,
associations, or groups and that are approved by the Louisiana Municipal
Association as provided in this Section.
D. The training requirement provided for in Subsection C of this Section
shall include any training that is required by state law, including the following:
(1) Ethics training pursuant to R.S. 42:1170.
(2) Sexual harassment prevention training pursuant to R.S. 42:343.
(3) Cybersecurity training pursuant to R.S. 42:1267.
(4) Campaign finance training pursuant to R.S. 42:1170.
(5) Training on procurement and letting of public contracts pursuant to R.S.
33:1420.32.
(6) Emergency preparedness training pursuant to R.S. 29:726(F)(2).
E. The Louisiana Municipal Association shall establish the training courses
offered to elected officials pursuant to Subsection C of this Section within, at a
minimum, the following categories of municipal governance:
(1) The Lawrason Act and municipal authority.
(2) The roles and responsibilities of mayors and municipal councils.
(3) Public budgeting, finance, audits, and procurement laws.
(4) Ethics and conflicts of interest.
(5) Human resources, personnel management, and civil service.
(6) Open Meetings Law and Public Records Law.
(7) Public safety, emergency preparedness, and police and fire operations.
(8) Utility operations and infrastructure management.
(9) Planning, zoning, annexation, and land use.
(10) Economic development and community engagement.
(11) Robert's Rules of Order and parliamentary procedure.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 431 ENROLLED
(12) Municipal best practices and compliance.
(13) Tax codes, revenue authority, and financial administration.
(14) Municipal retirement systems.
F.(1) Each mayor shall attest to his compliance with the training and
continuing education requirements of this Section using a form provided by the
legislative auditor. The attestation of the mayor shall be included with and made part
of the municipality's submission of its annual financial statements to the legislative
auditor as required by R.S. 24:513.
(2) The licensed certified public accountant engaged to perform the review
or audit of the municipality shall include verification of the mayor's compliance with
the training and continuing education requirements of this Section as part of the
accountant's engaged work.
(3) The legislative auditor shall maintain on his website a public list, by
municipality, of mayors who are compliant and who are non-compliant with the
training and continuing education requirements of this Section.
C. G. The provisions of this Part are applicable to any person who is
appointed temporarily to fill a vacancy in an elective office of any municipality
provided for in Subsection A of this Section The provisions of this Part shall not
apply to any person who is appointed temporarily to fill a vacancy in the office of
mayor if the duration of such appointment is less than one year.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.